Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-404
Annexation prohibited.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no land within the Lake Development District, as designated by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment pursuant to section 61-403, shall be annexed.

Laws 2022, LB1023, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 350.